Utah statutes.
13-28-8.   Enforcement.

(1)  The division shall investigate and assess administrative fines for violations of this chapter.

(2)  Upon referral from the division, the attorney general or any district or county attorney may:

(a)  bring an action for temporary or permanent injunctive or other relief in any court of competent jurisdiction for any violation of this part.  The court may, upon entry of final judgment, award restitution when appropriate to any person suffering loss because of a violation of this part if proof of loss is submitted to the satisfaction of the court;

(b)  bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for the collection of penalties authorized under Subsection 13-28-7(1); or

(c)  bring an action under Subsection 13-28-7(3).

